Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-207] Correcting a
filed document. (a) A domestic or foreign limited partnership may correct
a document filed by the director if the document:

(1) Contains an incorrect statement; or

(2) Was defectively executed, attested, sealed,
verified, or acknowledged.

(b) A document is corrected:

(1) By preparing a certificate of correction that:

(A) Describes the document, including its
file date or attaches a copy of it to the certificate;

(B) Specifies the incorrect statement and the
reason it is incorrect or the manner in which the execution was defective; and

(C) Corrects the incorrect statement or
defective execution; and

(2) By delivering the certificate to the director for
filing.

(c) A certificate of correction shall be
effective as of the effective date of the document it corrects; provided that
the certificate shall be effective when filed:

(1) For the purposes of section 425E-103(c) and (d);
and

(2) As to persons relying on the uncorrected record
and adversely affected by the correction. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next